Washington statutes.
RCW 18.130.300

Immunity from liability.

(1) The secretary, members of the boards or commissions, or individuals acting on their behalf are immune from suit in any action, civil or criminal, based on any disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

(2) A voluntary substance abuse monitoring program or an impaired practitioner program approved by a disciplining authority, or individuals acting on their behalf, are immune from suit in a civil action based on any disciplinary proceedings or other official acts performed in the course of their duties.

[ 1998 c 132 s 11; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 605; 1993 c 367 s 10; 1984 c 279 s 21.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1998 c 132: See notes following RCW 18.71.0195.

Severability—Headings and captions not law—Effective date—1994 sp.s. c 9: See RCW 18.79.900 through 18.79.902.